src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/Num_cyeti_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config: 
  hfst: 
    Gen: ../../generator-dict-gt-norm.hfstol
    Morph: ../../analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfstol
  xerox: 
    Gen: ../../generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests: 

  Numeral - čyeti:
    čyeti+Num+Sg+Nom: čyeti
    čyeti+Num+Sg+Gen: [čyeđe, čyet]
    čyeti+Num+Sg+Acc: čyeti
    čyeti+Num+Sg+Ill: čuátán
    čyeti+Num+Sg+Loc: čyeđeest
    čyeti+Num+Sg+Com: čuođijn
    čyeti+Num+Sg+Abe: čyeđettáá
    čyeti+Num+Ess: čyettin
    čyeti+Num+Pl+Nom: čyeđeh
    čyeti+Num+Pl+Gen: čuođij
    čyeti+Num+Pl+Acc: čuođijd
    čyeti+Num+Pl+Ill: čuođijd
    čyeti+Num+Pl+Loc: čuođijn
    čyeti+Num+Pl+Com: čuođijguin
    čyeti+Num+Pl+Abe: čuođijttáá
